Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-13] Severability. If
any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions
or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
severable. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L
2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next